Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.520

Dispensing of drug other than controlled substance—Supply limit.

(1) A pharmacist may dispense not more than a ninety-day supply of a drug other than a controlled substance pursuant to a valid prescription that specifies an initial quantity of less than a ninety-day supply followed by periodic refills of that amount if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The patient has completed an initial thirty-day supply of the drug. However, if the prescription continues the same medication as previously dispensed in a ninety-day supply, the initial thirty-day supply under this subsection (1) is not required;

(b) The total quantity of dosage units dispensed does not exceed the total quantity of dosage units authorized by the prescriber on the prescription including refills;

(c) The prescriber has not specified on the prescription that dispensing the prescription in an initial amount followed by periodic refills is medically necessary; and

(d) The pharmacist is exercising his or her professional judgment.

(2) In no case may a pharmacist dispense a greater supply of a drug pursuant to this section if the prescriber personally indicates, either orally or in their own handwriting, "no change to quantity," or words of similar meaning. Nothing in this section prohibits a prescriber from checking a box on a prescription marked "no change to quantity," provided that the prescriber personally initials the box or checkmark.

(3) A pharmacist dispensing an increased supply of a drug pursuant to this section shall notify the prescriber of the increase in the quantity of dosage units dispensed.

(4) Nothing in this section may be construed to require a health benefit plan, health carrier, workers' compensation insurance plan, pharmacy benefit manager, or any other person or entity including, but not limited to, a state program or state employer, to provide coverage in a manner inconsistent with the beneficiary's or enrollee's plan benefit.

[ 2013 c 262 s 1.]